Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-814
Lien; enforcement by civil action; statute of limitations.

Any lien provided for by the provisions of sections 57-801 to 57-820 may be enforced by civil action in the district court of the county in which the land identified with such leasehold interest, or pipeline, or some part thereof, is situated. Such action shall be brought within two years from the time of the filing of the lien statement as provided for in section 57-811.

Laws 1957, c. 241, § 14, p. 814.